Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Clean energy” has  the meaning given the term “nonemitting electricity” in ORS
469A.400.
(2) “Company” means any sole proprietorship, organization, firm, association, corpo-
ration, utility, partnership,  venture, public franchise, franchisor, franchisee or its wholly
owned subsidiary that exists for  profit-making purposes or otherwise to secure economic
advantage.
(3) “Investment” means the commitment of funds  or other assets to a company, includ-
ing a loan or other extension of credit  made to the company, or the ownership or control
of a share or interest in the company or of a bond  or other debt instrument issued by the
company.
(4) “Subject investment funds” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(5) “Thermal coal company” means a company, or a parent or subsidiary of a company:
(a) That derives at least 20 percent of its annual revenue from thermal coal production;
Enrolled House Bill 4083 (HB 4083-A) Page 1
(b) That accounts for more than one percent of global production of thermal coal; or
(c) Whose reported coal reserves contain more than  0.3 gigatons of potential carbon
dioxide emissions.
(6) “Urgewald Global Coal Exit List” means the list of  coal industry participants identi-
fied by the Urgewald organization.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Investment Council and the State Treasurer, in the State
Treasurer’s role as investment officer for the council, shall act reasonably  and in a manner
consistent with ORS 293.721 and 293.726 to try to  ensure that moneys in subject investment
funds are not invested in  any thermal coal company, or any fund containing a thermal coal
company.
(2) Divestment and reinvestment of moneys in subject investment funds under this  sec-
tion must be accomplished  without monetary loss to the funds through reasonable, prudent
and productive investments in  companies generating returns that are comparable to the re-
turns generated by the companies subject to divestment.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Investment Council and the State Treasurer, in the  State
Treasurer’s role as  investment officer for the council, shall make reasonable efforts to in-
vestigate all companies  in which the State Treasury has invested or may invest moneys in
subject investment funds to determine whether any of  those companies are thermal coal
companies.
(2) If the State Treasurer  determines that subject investment funds are invested in a
publicly traded company that is a thermal coal company, the State  Treasurer shall give no-
tice to the company  that the State Treasury will withdraw moneys in subject investment
funds that are invested in the company as described in section 2 of this 2024 Act  for as long
as the company is a thermal coal company.
(3) The State Treasurer may use the current Urgewald Global Coal Exit List to identify
thermal coal companies for purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this 2024 Act.
(4)(a) The State Treasurer may retain an investment in a thermal  coal company if the
company demonstrates that it is transitioning to clean energy on a reasonable timeline.
(b) The council may adopt rules to define a  reasonable timeline for such a transition. The
rules may reflect guidelines of the United  Nations Intergovernmental Panel on Climate
Change regarding necessary decreases in greenhouse gas emissions.
(c) The State Treasurer shall monitor thermal coal companies transitioning  to clean en-
ergy to ensure that the companies are on track to meet emissions reduction targets.
(5) The State Treasurer may  consult with managers of public employee pension funds in
California and New York regarding thermal coal companies  from which those funds have
divested.
SECTION 4. On or before January 15 of each year, the State Treasurer shall report to
the Legislative Assembly in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245 on actions taken by the
State Treasurer and the Oregon Investment Council pursuant to the  provisions of sections
1 to 5 of this 2024 Act. Annual  reports must be made under this section until no moneys in
subject investment funds  are invested in thermal coal companies. The State Treasurer shall
make reports under this section publicly available via the Internet.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 3 (2) to (5) and 4 of this 2024 Act apply only if the Legislative
Assembly appropriates sufficient moneys to the State Treasurer, other than moneys  de-
scribed by ORS 293.718 or moneys in  subject investment funds, to administer sections 3 (2)
to (5) and 4 of this 2024 Act.
(2) Any costs incurred by  the State Treasurer in administering sections 3 (2) to (5) and
4 of this 2024 Act may not be paid from subject investment funds.
Enrolled House Bill 4083 (HB 4083-A) Page 2
Passed by House February 19, 2024
Repassed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4083 (HB 4083-A) Page 3